Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.030

Arson in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of arson in the second degree if he or she knowingly and maliciously causes a fire or explosion which damages a building, or any structure or erection appurtenant to or joining any building, or any wharf, dock, machine, engine, automobile, or other motor vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, bridge, or trestle, or hay, grain, crop, or timber, whether cut or standing or any range land, or pasture land, or any fence, or any lumber, shingle, or other timber products, or any property.

(2) Arson in the second degree is a class B felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 366; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.030.]